Washington statutes.
RCW 18.100.095

Validity of share voting agreements.

Except for qualified trusts, a proxy, voting trust, or other voting agreement with respect to shares of a professional corporation shall not be valid unless all holders thereof, all trustees and beneficiaries thereof, or all parties thereto, as the case may be, are eligible to be shareholders of the corporation.

[ 1997 c 18 s 3; 1983 c 51 s 12.]